src/numeral-sme-lex.txt
LEXICON OKTANJEALJATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#njealját#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:%>#njealját#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#njealját#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#njealját#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr+Use/NG:%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot%> K ;
! +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
! +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
! +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#njealját#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#njealját#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>#njealját#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>#njealját#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Use/NG:%>#njealját#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4t#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:%>X4t#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:%>X4t#njealját#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON OKTAVIDATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#viđát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#viđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#viđát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#viđát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr+Use/NG:%>#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot%> K ;
! +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#viđát#lot%> K ;
! +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>#viđát#lot%> K ;
! +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#viđát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#viđát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>#viđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#viđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>#viđát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#viđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>#viđát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Use/NG:%>#viđát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4t#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:%>X4t#viđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:%>X4t#viđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#viđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#viđat#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#viđat#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>#viđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#viđat#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#viđat#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#viđat#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr+Use/NG:%>#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X4#viđat#lot%> K ;
! +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#viđat#lot%> K ;
! +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>#viđat#lot%> K ;
! +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#viđat#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#viđat#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>#viđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#viđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#viđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>#viđat#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#viđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>#viđat#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Use/NG:%>#viđat#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4t#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:%>X4t#viđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:%>X4t#viđat#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON 11TO99F
oktanjealjátlohkái:ok'ta OKTANJEALJATLOHKAI ;
oktaviđátlohkái:ok'ta OKTAVIDATLOHKAI ;
oktaviđatlohkái:ok'ta OKTAVIDATLOHKAI ;
oktanjealjátlohkái:ak'ta OKTANJEALJATLOHKAI ;
oktaviđátlohkái:ak'ta OKTAVIDATLOHKAI ;
oktaviđatlohkái:ak'ta OKTAVIDATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON 111TO119
oktanjealjátlohkái:ok'ta OKTANJEALJATLOHKAI ;
oktaviđátlohkái:ok'ta OKTAVIDATLOHKAI ;
oktaviđatlohkái:ok'ta OKTAVIDATLOHKAI ;
